en: Canned creamy puddings, Canned custard desserts
fr: Crèmes dessert en conserve, Crèmes dessert appertisées

en: Chocolate creamy puddings, Chocolate puddings, Chocolate custard dessert
es: Natillas chocolate
fr: Crèmes dessert chocolat, Crème dessert chocolat, Crèmes dessert au chocolat, Crème dessert au chocolat
hr: Čokoladni kremasti puding
lt: Šokoladinio kremo desertai
nl: Chocolade vla's, Chocoladevla's, Chocovla's

en: Canned chocolate creamy puddings, Canned chocolate custard dessert
fr: Crème dessert au chocolat en conserve, Crèmes dessert chocolat appertisées, Crème dessert au chocolat appertisée

en: Refrigerated chocolate creamy puddings, Refrigerated chocolate custard dessert
fr: Crèmes dessert chocolat réfrigérées

fr: Crèmes dessert chocolat noir, Crème dessert chocolat noir, Crèmes dessert au chocolat noir, Crème dessert au chocolat noir
nl: Chocolade puur vla's

en: Vanilla creamy puddings
es: Natillas vainilla
fr: Crèmes dessert vanille, Crème dessert vanille, Crèmes dessert à la vanille, Crème dessert à la vanille
hr: Kremasti puding od vanilije
nl: Vanilla vla's
pt: Natilhas baunilha

en: Canned vanilla puddings, Cannned vanilla puddings, Canned vanilla custard dessert
fr: Crème dessert à la vanille en conserve, crèmes dessert vanille appertisées, Crème dessert à la vanille appertisée

en: Refrigerated vanilla creamy puddings, Refrigerated vanilla custard dessert
fr: Crèmes dessert vanille réfrigérées, Crème dessert à la vanille rayon frais

en: Refrigerated custard dessert with reduced fat
fr: Crème dessert allégée en matières grasses rayon frais

en: Caramel creamy puddings, Caramel puddings, caramel custard dessert
es: Natillas caramelo
fr: Crèmes dessert caramel, Crème dessert caramel, Crèmes dessert au caramel, Crème dessert au caramel
hr: Karamel kremasti puding
nl: Caramel vla's

en: Refrigerated caramel creamy puddings, refrigerated caramel custard dessert
fr: Crèmes dessert caramel réfrigérées, Crème dessert au caramel rayon frais

en: Coffee creamy puddings, coffee puddings, coffee custard dessert
fr: Crèmes dessert café
hr: Kremasti puding od kave
lt: Kavos kremo desertai
nl: Koffie vla's, Koffievla's

en: Refrigerated coffee puddings, Refrigerated coffee custard dessert
fr: Crèmes dessert café réfrigérées, Crème dessert au café rayon frais, Crèmes dessert au café rayon frais, Yaourts au café

en: Non-dairy desserts, vegetal desserts, vegan desserts
de: Milchfreie Nachtische, vegetarische Nachtische, vegane Nachtische
es: Postres vegetales
fi: Maidottomat jälkiruoat
fr: Desserts végétaliens, desserts végétaux, desserts sans lait
hr: Nemliječne slastice
it: Dolci senza latte
lt: Ne pieno desertai, augaliniai desertai, veganiški desertai
nl: Plantaardige desserts, plantaardige toetjes
pt: Sobremesas não lácteas

en: Dairy desserts
bg: Млечни десерти
ca: Postres làctics
de: Milchnachspeisen, Nachspeisen auf Milchbasis
es: Postres lácteos
fi: Maitojälkiruoat
fr: Desserts lactés, Desserts à base de lait, Desserts au lait
he: קינוחים חלביים
hr: Mliječne slastice
hu: Tejipari desszertek, tejes desszertek
it: Dolci a base di latte, dessert a base di latte
lt: Pieniniai desertai, Desertai iš pieno
nl: Desserts op basis van melk, Nagerechten op basis van melk, Toetjes op basis van melk
pl: Desery mleczne
pt: Sobremesas de laticínios
ru: Молочные десерты, Десерты молочные
zh: 奶类甜品

xx: Shrikhand
en: Shrikhand

en: Junkets
fr: Laits emprésurés, laits caillés

en: Plain junkets
fr: Laits emprésurés nature

en: Flavoured junkets
fr: Laits emprésurés aromatisés

en: Chocolate junkets
fr: Laits emprésurés au chocolat